California statutes. Public Utilities Code
Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division or any other law, the provisions of all ordinances, resolutions, and other proceedings in the issuance by the board of any bonds, bonds with a pledge of revenues, bonds for improvement districts, revenue bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or any and all evidences of indebtedness or liability constitute a contract between the board and the holders of the bonds, equipment trust certificates, notes, or evidences of indebtedness or liability, and the provisions thereof are enforceable against the board or any or all of its successors or assigns, by mandamus or any other appropriate suit, action, or proceeding in law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.

Nothing in this division or in any other law shall be held to relieve the board or the territory included within it from any bonded or other debt or liability contracted by the board. Upon dissolution of the board or upon withdrawal of territory therefrom, that territory formerly included within the board, or withdrawn therefrom, shall continue to be liable for the payment of all bonded and other indebtedness or liabilities outstanding at the time of the dissolution or withdrawal as if the board had not been so dissolved or the territory withdrawn therefrom, and it shall be the duty of the successors or assigns to provide for the payment of the bonded and other indebtedness and liabilities.

Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of revenues, or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated, or controlled by the board shall be pledged, charged, assigned, and have a lien thereon for the payment of the bonds as long as they are outstanding, regardless of any change in ownership, operation, or control of the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property and it shall, in any later event or events, be the duty of the successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 599, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 11.5. NORTH COUNTY TRANSIT DISTRICT [125000. - 125716.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [125000. - 125002.]

125000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “North County Transit District Act.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125001.

As used in this division, “district” means the North County Transit District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125002.

It is the intent of the Legislature to improve existing public transportation coordination. The Legislature recognizes that in order to achieve a unified, coordinated public transportation system within the San Diego region, it may be necessary to form a regionwide transit district at some future time. It is the intent of the Legislature that the North County Transit District shall reserve the right to join and merge with such a regionwide district at such time as it is deemed mutually beneficial by the board and the region as a whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Creation of Board [125050. - 125052.]

125050.

There is hereby created, in that portion of the County of San Diego as described in Section 125052, the North County Transit District. The district shall be governed by a board of directors. As used in this division, “board” means the board of directors of the district. The board shall consist of members selected as follows:

(a) One member of the San Diego County Board of Supervisors appointed by the board of supervisors, which member shall represent, on the board of supervisors, the largest portion of the area under the jurisdiction of the district.

(b) One member of each of the City Councils of the Cities of Carlsbad, Del Mar, Encinitas, Escondido, Oceanside, San Marcos,
 Solana Beach, and Vista, and each new city that incorporates within the district boundaries, appointed by the respective city council.

(c) One nonvoting member who shall be a member of the City Council of the City of San Diego.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   (AB 2982)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125051.

Each of the governing bodies appointing a member of the board pursuant to Section 125050 shall also appoint one alternate to serve on the board when the member is not available. The alternate shall be subject to the same restrictions and shall have the same powers, when serving on the board, as the member.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125052.

The area of jurisdiction of the board shall consist of the following areas:

(a) The Cities of Carlsbad, Del Mar, Encinitas, Escondido, Oceanside, San Marcos, Solana Beach, and Vista and each new city that incorporates within the district boundaries.

(b) Camp Joseph H. Pendleton.

(c) The unincorporated areas of San Diego County lying within census tracts: 170.04 (but excluding that portion lying east of the eastern boundary of the City of San Diego), 171.00, 173.00, 174.01, 174.02, 175.00, 176.00, 177.00, 178.02, 185.02, 185.03, 186.01, 186.02, 188.00, 189.01, 189.02, 190.00, 191.01, 191.02, 192.01, 192.02, 193.00, 194.00, 196.00, 197.00, 198.00, 199.00, 200.01, 200.02, 200.03, 201.01, 201.02, 202.03, 202.05, 203.00, 204.00, 206.02, 207.01, 207.02, and 208.00, as set forth in the 1970 decennial census maps for the State of California on file with the Bureau of the Census, Department of Commerce, Washington, D.C.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Administration [125100. - 125107.]

125100.

The board at its first meeting, and thereafter annually at the first meeting in January, shall elect a chairman who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairman who shall preside in his absence. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairman pro tem, who, while so acting, shall have all of the authority of the chairman.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125101.

The board shall establish rules for its proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125102.

(a) A majority of the members of the board constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business. All official acts of the board require the affirmative vote of the majority of the members of the board present. However, after a vote of the members is taken, a weighted vote may be called by any two members.

(b) In the case of a weighted vote, the County of San Diego and each city shall, in total, exercise 100 votes to be apportioned annually based on population.

(c) Approval under the weighted vote procedure requires the vote of the representatives of not less than three jurisdictions representing not less than 51 percent of the total weighted vote to supersede
 the original action of the board.

(d) When a weighted vote is taken on any item that requires more than a majority vote of the board, it shall also require the supermajority percentage of the weighted vote.

(e) For purposes of subdivision (b), the population of the County of San Diego is the population in the unincorporated area of the county within the area of jurisdiction of the board pursuant to Section 125052.

(f) The board shall adopt a policy and procedure to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 8.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

125103.

The acts of the board shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125104.

All meetings of the board shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950), Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125105.

The board shall:

(a) Acquire, construct, maintain, and operate (or let a contract to operate) public transit systems and related facilities.

(b) Adopt an annual budget and fix the compensation of the district’s officers and employees.

(c) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, that prescribes the powers and duties of district officers, the method of appointment of district employees, and methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management of the district.

(d) Cause a postaudit of the financial transactions and records of the district to be made at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(e) Appoint advisory commissions as it deems necessary.

(f) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this division, including, but not limited to, adopting all ordinances and making all rules and regulations proper or necessary to regulate the use, operation, and maintenance of the district’s property and facilities, including its public transit systems and related transportation facilities and services operating within its area of jurisdiction and those areas beyond its jurisdiction served by the district pursuant to contract or memorandum of agreement with another transit agency, and to carry into effect the powers granted to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125106.

Notice of time and place of the public hearing for the adoption of the annual budget shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, and shall be published not later than the 15th day prior to the date of the hearing.

The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

125107.

Each member of the board, including an alternate member appointed pursuant to Section 125051 when acting on behalf of the member, shall be paid one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each meeting of the board or other meeting of a governmental entity the member or alternate attends, but not to exceed seven hundred fifty dollars ($750) in any month, and the necessary and reasonable expenses in performing the duties as a board member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   (AB 1757)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Powers and Functions [125200. - 125488.]



  ARTICLE 1. Corporate Powers [125200. - 125202.]

125200.

The district has perpetual succession and may adopt a seal and alter it at its pleasure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125201.

The district may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125202.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Contracts [125220. - 125227.]

125220.

The district may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature whatsoever, either in connection with eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, including, but not limited to, contracts and stipulations to indemnify and save harmless, to employ labor, to contract with a private patrol operator licensed pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 7583) of Chapter 11.5 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, the county sheriff and municipal police departments within the areas described in Section 125052, and other transit development boards for security, police, and related services, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 325, Sec. 2.   (AB 1757)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

125221.

The district may contract with any department or agency of the federal government, any other public agency, or any person upon such terms and conditions as the district finds is in its best interest.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 125222 by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 3.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125222.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a compelling interest exists in ensuring all federal, state, local, and private moneys available to the district are captured and used in a timely manner.

(b) In order to maximize the use of federal, state, local, and private funds, and to maintain a competitive posture in seeking supplemental federal funds, the board may establish and use a flexible contracting process, consistent with this division, to maximize its efficient use of public funds.

(c) For the acquisition or lease of materials, supplies, or equipment, except in cases where an item of a specified brand or trade name is the only item that will properly meet the needs of the district or in an
 emergency declared by the vote of two-thirds of all the members of the board, all contracts shall be awarded as follows:

(1) A contract with an expected cost that equals or exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), as authorized by the board, shall be made or entered into with the lowest responsible bidder that meets the specifications. For purposes of determining the lowest bid, the amount of sales tax shall be excluded from the total amount of the bid.

(2) A contract with an expected cost that does not equal or exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be made or entered into using a district-approved competitive procurement process. When the expected cost of a contract equals or exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) and does not equal or exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the district shall seek a minimum of three quotations,
 either written or oral, to permit comparison of prices and other terms.

(d) For the acquisition of services that are not within a category of services described in Section 4525 of the Government Code, except in cases of an emergency declared by a vote of two-thirds of the membership of the board, all contracts shall be awarded as follows:

(1) A contract with an expected cost that equals or exceeds one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be made and entered into by soliciting bids in writing and awarding the contract using a district-approved competitive procurement process, including, but not limited to, a negotiated procurement that may or may not evaluate price as a consideration.

(2) A contract with an expected cost that does not equal or exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) shall be
 made or entered into using a district-approved competitive procurement process. When the expected cost of a service contract equals or exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) and does not equal or exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), the district shall seek a minimum of three quotations, either written or oral, to permit comparison of prices and other terms.

(e) The board shall award contracts for architectural, landscape architectural, engineering, environmental, and land surveying services, and construction project management services, as those services are described in Section 4525 of the Government Code, in accordance with Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 4525) of Division 5 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(f) Notwithstanding this chapter, the board may use any approved competitive procurement process authorized for state or local agencies under state or
 federal law, including, but not limited to, a competitive negotiation process in accordance with Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 20216) of Chapter 1 of Part 3 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. The board shall maintain acquisition and contracting guidelines and comply with those guidelines in the procurement of all goods and services.

(g) Provisions that are in a federally funded contract concerning disadvantaged business enterprises and that are in accordance with the request for proposals shall not be subject to negotiation with the successful bidder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 202.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

125222.5.

The district shall not enter into a construction contract over one million dollars ($1,000,000) with any entity unless the entity provides to the district an enforceable commitment that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the project or a contract that falls within an apprenticeship occupation in the building and construction trades in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(a) This subdivision shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(1) The district has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and
 subcontractors performing work on the project or the district has contracted to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity has agreed to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(2) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the district before January 1, 2017.

(3) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or the entity has contracted to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 9.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

125223.

(a) If, after rejecting bids received under Section 125222, the board determines and declares by a two-thirds vote of all of its members that, in its opinion, the supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the board may proceed to purchase these supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions regarding contracts, bids, or advertisements.

(b) If, after solicitation of bids under Section 125222, the board determines and declares by a majority vote that it has not received a responsive bid, the board may proceed to purchase the supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further complying with any contracting,
 bidding, or advertising requirements.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 125224 by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 6.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125224.

(a) Upon determining that an immediate remedial measure to avert or alleviate damage to, or to repair or restore the damaged or destroyed property of, the district is necessary to ensure that the district’s facilities are available to serve the transportation needs of the general public, or to comply with any state or federal regulations with respect to the operation of public transportation services, and upon determining that available remedial measures, including procurement in compliance with Sections 125222 and 125223, are inadequate, the executive director may authorize the expenditure of moneys previously appropriated by the board specifically for the direct purchase of goods and services, without complying with Section 125222 or 125223.

(b) The executive director, after the expenditure authorized under subdivision (a) has been made, shall submit to the board a full report explaining the necessity for that action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 7.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125225.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, and upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that a purchase in compliance with Sections 125222 and 125223 does not constitute a method of procurement adequate for the operation of the district’s facilities or equipment, the board may direct the procurement of prototype equipment or modifications in an amount sufficient to conduct and evaluate operational testing without further compliance with any contracting, bidding, or advertising requirements.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 8.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125225.1.

Notwithstanding Section 125222, the board may direct the purchase of any supplies, equipment, or materials without complying with any contracting, bidding, or advertising requirements upon a finding by two-thirds of all members of the board that there is only a single source of procurement and that the purchase is for the sole purpose of duplicating, repairing, or replacing supplies, equipment, or materials that are in use, including upgrades or migrations of proprietary intellectual property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 9.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125225.2.

(a) A person who submits, or who plans to submit, a proposal in response to a procurement solicitation may protest any acquisition conducted pursuant to Sections 125222 and 125223 as follows:

(1) Protests based on the content of the procurement solicitation shall be filed with the district within 10 calendar days after the procurement solicitation is first advertised.  The executive director, or the designee of the executive director, shall issue a written decision on the protest prior to the opening of the procurement solicitation.  A protest may be renewed by refiling the protest with the board within 15 calendar days after the posting of the notice of the intent to award.

(2) Any bidder may protest the intent to award on any ground not based upon the content of the procurement solicitation by filing a protest with the district within 15 calendar days after the posting of the notice of the intent to award. The executive director, or the designee of the executive director, shall issue a written decision on the protest.

(3) Any protest shall contain a full and complete written statement specifying in detail the grounds of the protest and the facts supporting the protest. Protestors shall have an opportunity to appear and be heard before the board prior to the opening of the procurement solicitation in the case of protests based on the content of the procurement solicitation or renewed protests based on the content of the procurement solicitation, or prior to final award in the case of protests based on other grounds.

(b) The decision on
 the protest by the board shall be in writing and shall constitute a final administrative decision for purposes of judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.6 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 554, Sec. 10.   (AB 3177)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

125226.

The district may insure against any accident or destruction of the system or any part thereof. The district may also provide insurance as provided in Part 6 (commencing with Section 989) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125227.

The district may contract for the services of independent contractors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Property [125240. - 125241.]

125240.

The district may take by grant, purchase, devise, or lease, or condemn in proceedings under eminent domain, or otherwise acquire, and hold and enjoy, real and personal property of every kind within or without its area of jurisdiction necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers. The district may lease, mortgage, sell, or otherwise dispose of any real or personal property within or without its area of jurisdiction necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125241.

The district is entitled to the benefit of any reservation or grant, in all cases, where any right has been reserved or granted to any public agency to construct or maintain roads, highways, or other crossings over any public or private lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Transit System [125260. - 125260.]

125260.

The district shall plan, construct, and operate (or let a contract to operate) public transit systems in conformance with, and to the extent provided for in, the San Diego Regional Transportation Consolidation Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Transportation Funding [125350. - 125352.]

125350.

The district shall be deemed a provider of services within the area of its jurisdiction for purposes of Section 1604 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125351.

The district shall take all action necessary to obtain the maximum amount of funding available pursuant to Section 1602 of Title 49 of the United States Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125352.

It is the intent of this section that the district shall file application for funds for public transportation in conformity with, and subject to the limitations set forth in, the San Diego Regional Transportation Consolidation Act (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 132350) of Division 12.7) under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 99200) of Part 11 of Division 10.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Public Contributions, Grants, Loans, and Contracts Cooperation [125400. - 125400.]

125400.

The district may accept contributions, grants, or loans from any public agency or the United States or any department, instrumentality, or agency thereof, for the purpose of financing the planning, acquisition, construction, or operation of public transit systems, and may enter into contracts and cooperate with, and accept cooperation from, any public agency or the United States, or agency thereof, in the planning, acquisition, construction, or operation of those systems in accordance with any legislation that Congress or the Legislature may have heretofore adopted or may hereafter adopt, under which aid, assistance, and cooperation may be furnished by the United States or any public agency in the planning, acquisition, construction, or operation of those systems. The district may do any and all things necessary in order to avail itself of that aid, assistance, and cooperation under any federal or state legislation now or hereafter enacted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Transit Enforcement and Penalties [125450. - 125453.]

125450.

A violation of any ordinance, rule, or regulation enacted by the board relating to the nonpayment of a fare in any transit facility owned or controlled by the district shall be an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding seventy-five dollars ($75), except that a violation by a person, after the second conviction under this section, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 150, Sec. 25.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

125451.

No person shall give, either orally or in writing, information to a public officer or employee engaged in the enforcement of this article if that person knows that the information is false. A violation of this section is an infraction punishable by a fine not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75), except that a violation by a person, after a second conviction of a violation of this section, shall be a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

This section is in addition to, and does not supersede or limit, any and all other remedies, civil or criminal.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 990, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

125452.

A violation of any ordinance, rule, or regulation enacted by the board prohibiting unauthorized operation or manipulation of transit facilities owned or controlled by the board, or prohibiting unauthorized tampering or interference with, or loitering in or about, transit facilities owned or controlled by the board, is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding seventy-five dollars ($75), except that a violation by a person, after the first conviction under this section, is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 990, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

125453.

A violation of any ordinance, rule, or regulation enacted by the board prohibiting the unauthorized entering into, climbing upon, holding onto, or in any manner attaching oneself to vehicles operated upon exclusive public mass transit guideways owned or controlled by the board, is an infraction punishable by a fine not exceeding seventy-five dollars ($75), except that a violation by a person, after the first conviction under this section, is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 990, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Transactions and Use Tax [125480. - 125488.]

125480.

(a) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance applicable to the entirety of, or a portion of, the incorporated and unincorporated territory within the area of the board pursuant to Section 125052 shall be imposed by the board in accordance with Section 125485, the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), and Section 2 of Article XIIIC of the California Constitution. The tax ordinance shall take effect at the close of the polls on the day of election at which the proposition is adopted. The initial collection of the transactions and use tax shall take place in accordance with Section 125483.

(b) If, at any time, the voters do not approve the imposition of the transactions and use tax, this chapter remains in full force and effect. The board may, at any time thereafter, submit the same, or a different, measure to the voters in accordance with this chapter.

(c) The portion of the area of the board to which the tax would apply shall be determined by the board before the electors vote on the measure.

(d) If the tax only applies to a portion of an area of the board, both of the following shall apply:

(1) (A) The incorporated area of each city and of contiguous cities within the area of the board shall be either wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion. For purposes
 of this subparagraph, “contiguous cities” means two or more cities with shared borders.

(B) The entire unincorporated area of the board shall either be wholly included within that portion or wholly excluded from that portion.

(2) (A) The board shall not enter into a construction contract over one million dollars ($1,000,000) that would be in part or wholly financed through the tax with any entity unless the entity provides to the board an enforceable commitment that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the
 project or a contract that falls within an apprenticeship occupation in the building and construction trades in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(B) This paragraph shall not apply if any of the following requirements are met:

(i) The board has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project.

(ii) The board has contracted to use a skilled and trained workforce and the entity has agreed to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(iii) The project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the board before January 1, 2019.

(iv) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all its subcontractors at every tier performing the project or the entity has contracted to use a skilled and trained workforce.

(C) For purposes of this paragraph, “project labor agreement” has the same meaning as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code. 

(e) The revenues derived from the tax shall be spent within, or for the benefit of, the portion of the area of the board to which the tax applies, and shall be spent only on transportation and transit infrastructure and services.

(f) Any revenues derived from the tax shall supplement, and not supplant, other transportation revenues available to the portion of the area of the board to which the tax applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 758, Sec. 6.   (AB 1413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

125481.

(a) The board, in the ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed, the tax rate or the maximum tax rate, the purposes for which the revenue derived from the tax will be used, the portion of the area of the board to which the tax would apply, and may set a term during which the tax will be imposed. The purposes for which the tax revenues may be used shall be limited to public transit purposes serving the area of jurisdiction of the board, as determined by the board, including the administration of this division and legal actions related thereto. These purposes include expenditures for the planning, environmental reviews, engineering and design costs, and related right-of-way acquisition. The ordinance shall contain an expenditure plan
 that shall include the allocation of revenues for the purposes authorized by this section.

(b) As used in this section, “public transit purposes” includes the public transit responsibilities under the jurisdiction of the district as well as any repair, redesign, or ongoing maintenance of a right-of-way upon which transit is intended to travel, or any bikeway, bicycle path, sidewalk, trail, pedestrian access, or pedestrian accessway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 758, Sec. 7.   (AB 1413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

125482.

(a) The county shall conduct an election called by the board pursuant to Section 125480.

(b) The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 10.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

125483.

(a) A transactions and use tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this article shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 150 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(b) (1) Before the operative date of the ordinance, the board shall contract with the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance. The costs to be covered by the contract may also include services of the types described in Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for preparatory work up to the operative date of the ordinance. Any disputes as to the amount of the
 costs shall be resolved in the same manner as provided in that section.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 7272 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the maximum amount of preparatory costs incurred may exceed those costs as described in paragraph (1), if the increased amount reflects necessary preparatory costs.

(c) Within 45 days from the date the ordinance is approved by the voters, the board shall provide the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration with a complete alphabetical list of all streets within the affected area under the jurisdiction of the board pursuant to Section 125052, which shall include beginning and ending street numbers, and shall maintain that list on its internet website. The board shall also provide a legal description and a map or plat, that both
 describe the boundaries of the applicable area of the board pursuant to Section 125052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 758, Sec. 8.   (AB 1413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

125484.

The revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to this article may be allocated by the board for public transit purposes consistent with the applicable regional transportation improvement program and the applicable regional transportation plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 658, Sec. 10.   (AB 805)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

125485.
